Maryland, session 2025, HB0414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
10–209.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE MENTAL HEALTH CARE FUND
FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH.
(B) THERE IS A MENTAL HEALTH CARE FUND FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO IMPROVE ACCESS TO MENTAL
HEALTH CARE SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH IN THE STATE.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 414 3
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE
4B OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR IMPROVING ACCESS TO MENTAL
HEALTH CARE SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH IN THE STATE.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR IMPROVING ACCESS TO
MENTAL HEALTH CARE FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH IN THE STATE IS SUPPLEMENTAL
TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE
WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR IMPROVING ACCESS TO MENTAL HEALTH CARE FOR
CHILDREN AND YOUTH IN THE STATE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to

HOUSE BILL 414
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE MENTAL HEALTH CARE FUND FOR CHILDREN
AND YOUTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(G–2) “DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX” MEANS THE TAX
IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 7.7 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(g–2)] (G–3) (1) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the
Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission.
(2) “Executive Director” includes a deputy, an inspector, or any other
individual acting within the scope of the Executive Director’s authority.
2–102.
(a) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this article and in other articles
of the Code, the Comptroller shall administer the laws that relate to:
(1) the admissions and amusement tax;
(2) the boxing and wrestling tax;
(3) the digital advertising gross revenues tax;
(4) THE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX;
(5) the income tax;

HOUSE BILL 414 5
[(5)] (6) the Maryland estate tax;
[(6)] (7) the Maryland generation–skipping transfer tax;
[(7)] (8) the motor carrier tax;
[(8)] (9) the motor fuel tax;
[(9)] (10) the sales and use tax; and
[(10)] (11) the savings and loan association franchise tax.
SUBTITLE 4B. DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX DISTRIBUTION.
2–4B–01.
FROM THE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX REVENUE, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE EACH QUARTER THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO
ADMINISTER THE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX LAWS IN THE
PREVIOUS QUARTER TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST ACCOUNT.
2–4B–02.
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTION REQUIRED UNDER § 2–4B–01 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINING DIGITAL
SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX REVENUE TO THE MENTAL HEALTH CARE
FUND FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–209 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
TITLE 7.7. DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
7.7–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES” MEANS INCOME OR REVENUE FROM ALL
SOURCES, BEFORE ANY EXPENSES OR TAXES, COMPUTED ACCORDING TO
GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES.
(C) “ASSESSABLE BASE” MEANS THE ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES DERIVED

HOUSE BILL 414
FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) “DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICE” MEANS A SERVICE PROVIDED
TO THE PUBLIC THROUGH AN INTERNET WEBSITE OR A MOBILE APPLICATION THAT:
(I) INCLUDES FEATURES THAT ALLOW A USER TO SHARE
IMAGES, TEXT, OR VIDEO THROUGH THE INTERNET WITH OTHER USERS OF THE
SERVICE WHOM THE USER HAS MET, IDENTIFIED, OR BECOME AWARE OF THROUGH
THE USE OF THE SERVICE; AND
(II) HAS MORE THAN 1,000,000 MONTHLY ACTIVE USERS IN THE
UNITED STATES OR GENERATES MORE THAN $500,000,000 IN ANNUAL GROSS
REVENUE, ADJUSTED ANNUALLY FOR INFLATION.
(2) “DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SERVICE
THAT IS PRIMARILY USED FOR:
(I) THE SALE OR PROVISION OF PROFESSIONAL SERVICES;
(II) THE SALE OF COMMERCIAL PRODUCTS; OR
(III) IF THE SERVICE DOES NOT INCLUDE THE ABILITY FOR
CONTENT TO BE SENT BY A USER DIRECTLY TO ANOTHER USER, THE PROVISION OF
NEWS OR INFORMATION.
(E) “USER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO ACCESSES
A DIGITAL INTERFACE WITH A DEVICE.
7.7–102.
(A) A TAX IS IMPOSED ON ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES OF A PERSON DERIVED
FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE, THE PART OF THE ANNUAL GROSS
REVENUES OF A PERSON DERIVED FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE
STATE SHALL BE DETERMINED USING AN APPORTIONMENT FRACTION:
(I) THE NUMERATOR OF WHICH IS THE ANNUAL GROSS
REVENUES OF A PERSON DERIVED FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE
STATE; AND
(II) THE DENOMINATOR OF WHICH IS THE ANNUAL GROSS
REVENUES OF A PERSON DERIVED FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE

HOUSE BILL 414 7
UNITED STATES.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
DETERMINE THE STATE FROM WHICH REVENUES FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA
SERVICES ARE DERIVED.
7.7–103.
THE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX RATE IS:
(1) 5% OF THE ASSESSABLE BASE FOR A PERSON WITH GLOBAL
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES OF $500,000,000 THROUGH $1,000,000,000;
(2) 7.5% OF THE ASSESSABLE BASE FOR A PERSON WITH GLOBAL
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES OF $1,000,000,001 THROUGH $10,000,000,000; AND
(3) 10% OF THE ASSESSABLE BASE FOR A PERSON WITH GLOBAL
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES EXCEEDING $10,000,000,000.
SUBTITLE 2. RETURNS.
7.7–201.
(A) EACH PERSON THAT, IN A CALENDAR YEAR, HAS ANNUAL GROSS
REVENUES DERIVED FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE STATE OF AT
LEAST $1,000,000 SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER OATH, AND FILE WITH THE
COMPTROLLER A RETURN, ON OR BEFORE APRIL 15 OF THE NEXT YEAR.
(B) (1) EACH PERSON THAT REASONABLY EXPECTS THE PERSON’S
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES DERIVED FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE
STATE TO EXCEED $1,000,000 SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER OATH, AND FILE WITH THE
COMPTROLLER A DECLARATION OF ESTIMATED TAX, ON OR BEFORE APRIL 15 OF
THAT YEAR.
(2) A PERSON REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION TO FILE A DECLARATION OF ESTIMATED TAX FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
SHALL COMPLETE AND FILE WITH THE COMPTROLLER A QUARTERLY ESTIMATED
TAX RETURN ON OR BEFORE JUNE 15, SEPTEMBER 15, AND DECEMBER 15 OF THAT
YEAR.
(C) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
FILE WITH THE RETURN AN ATTACHMENT THAT STATES ANY INFORMATION THAT
THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES TO DETERMINE ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES DERIVED

HOUSE BILL 414
FROM DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES IN THE STATE.
7.7–202.
A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.7–201 OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES PROVIDED IN THE
STATE AND THE BASIS FOR THE CALCULATION OF THE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA
GROSS REVENUES TAX OWED.
SUBTITLE 3. TAX PAYMENT.
7.7–301.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, EACH
PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.7–201 OF THIS TITLE SHALL PAY
THE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX WITH THE RETURN THAT COVERS
THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE TAX IS DUE.
(B) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE ESTIMATED DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA
GROSS REVENUES TAX RETURNS UNDER § 7.7–201(B) OF THIS TITLE SHALL PAY:
(1) AT LEAST 25% OF THE ESTIMATED DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS
REVENUES TAX SHOWN ON THE DECLARATION OR AMENDED DECLARATION FOR A
TAXABLE YEAR:
(I) WITH THE DECLARATION OR AMENDED DECLARATION THAT
COVERS THE YEAR; AND
(II) WITH EACH QUARTERLY RETURN FOR THAT YEAR; AND
(2) ANY UNPAID DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX FOR
THE YEAR SHOWN ON THE PERSON’S RETURN THAT COVERS THAT YEAR WITH THE
RETURN.
13–201.
In this subtitle, “tax information” means:
(4) any information contained in:
(i) an admissions and amusement tax return;
(ii) an alcoholic beverage tax return;

HOUSE BILL 414 9
(iii) a bay restoration fee return;
(iv) a boxing and wrestling tax return;
(v) a digital advertising gross revenues tax return;
(VI) A DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX RETURN;
[(vi)] (VII) an E–9–1–1 fee return;
[(vii)] (VIII) a financial institution franchise tax return;
[(viii)] (IX) an inheritance tax return;
[(ix)] (X) a Maryland estate tax return;
[(x)] (XI) a motor carrier tax return;
[(xi)] (XII) a motor fuel tax return;
[(xii)] (XIII) an other tobacco products tax return;
[(xiii)] (XIV) a public service company franchise tax return;
[(xiv)] (XV) a sales and use tax return;
[(xv)] (XVI) a savings and loan association franchise tax return;
[(xvi)] (XVII) a tire recycling fee return;
[(xvii)] (XVIII) a tobacco tax return; or
[(xviii)] (XIX) a transportation services assessment return.
13–402.
(a) If a notice and demand for a return is made under § 13–303 of this title and
the person or governmental unit fails to file the return, the tax collector shall:
(5) for public service company franchise tax:
(i) estimate gross receipts from the best information in the
possession of the tax collector; and
(ii) assess the tax due on the estimated gross receipts; [and]

HOUSE BILL 414
(6) for digital advertising gross revenues tax:
(i) estimate gross revenues from the best information in possession
of the tax collector; and
(ii) assess the tax due on the estimated assessable base; AND
(7) FOR DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX:
(I) ESTIMATE GROSS REVENUES FROM THE BEST
INFORMATION IN POSSESSION OF THE TAX COLLECTOR; AND
(II) ASSESS THE TAX DUE ON THE ESTIMATED ASSESSABLE
BASE.
13–602.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a tax collector
shall assess interest on unpaid tax from the due date to the date on which the tax is paid if
a person who is required to estimate and pay digital advertising gross revenues tax,
DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX, financial institution franchise tax,
public service company franchise tax, or income tax under § 7.5–301, § 7.7–301, § 8–210(b),
§ 8–405(b), or § 10–902 of this article:
(1) fails to pay an installment when due; or
(2) estimates a tax that is:
(i) less than 90% of the tax required to be shown on the return for
the current taxable year; and
(ii) less than 110% of the tax paid for the prior taxable year, reduced
by the credit allowed under § 10–703 of this article.
13–702.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a tax collector
shall assess a penalty not exceeding 25% of the amount underestimated, if a person who is
required to estimate and pay digital advertising gross revenues tax, DIGITAL SOCIAL
MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX, financial institution franchise tax, public service company
franchise tax, or income tax under § 7.5–301, § 7.7–301, § 8–210(b), § 8–405(b), or §
10–902 of this article:
(1) fails to pay an installment when due; or
(2) estimates a tax that is:

HOUSE BILL 414 11
(i) less than 90% of the tax required to be shown on the return for
the current taxable year; and
(ii) less than 110% of the tax paid for the prior taxable year, reduced
by the credit allowed under § 10–703 of this article.
13–1001.
(H) A PERSON WHO IS REQUIRED TO FILE A DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS
REVENUES TAX RETURN AND WHO WILLFULLY FAILS TO FILE THE RETURN AS
REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 7.7 OF THIS ARTICLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND,
ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
13–1002.
(b) A person, including an officer of a corporation, who willfully files a false digital
advertising gross revenues tax return, A FALSE DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS
REVENUES TAX RETURN, a false financial institution franchise tax return, a false public
service company franchise tax return, or a false income tax return with the intent to evade
the payment of tax due under this article is guilty of perjury and, on conviction, is subject
to the penalty for perjury.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to the alcoholic beverage, digital
advertising gross revenues, DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES, financial
institution franchise, public service company franchise, and income taxes.
13–1101.
(b) An assessment of digital advertising gross revenues tax, DIGITAL SOCIAL
MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX, financial institution franchise tax, public service company
franchise tax, income tax, or estate tax may be made at any time if:
(1) a false return is filed with the intent to evade the tax;
(2) a willful attempt is made to evade the tax;
(3) a return is not filed as required under Title 7, Title 7.5, TITLE 7.7, Title
8, or Title 10 of this article;
(4) an amended estate tax return is not filed as required under Title 7 of
this article;
(5) an incomplete return is filed; or

HOUSE BILL 414
(6) a report of federal adjustment is not filed within the period required
under § 13–409 of this title.
(c) If a report of federal adjustment is filed within the time required under §
13–409 of this title, the tax collector shall assess the digital advertising gross revenues tax,
DIGITAL SOCIAL MEDIA GROSS REVENUES TAX, financial institution franchise tax,
public service company franchise tax, income tax, or estate tax within 1 year after the date
on which the tax collector receives the report.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.